Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-116
Future interests; indestructibility of contingent interests.

No future interest, whether legal or equitable, shall be destroyed by the mere termination, in any manner, of any or all preceding interests before the happening of the contingency to which the future interest is subject.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 16, p. 597;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1016;

R.S.1943, § 76-116.